Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 10-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 10-103. On the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November in each year next preceding the expiration of the term of
office of each President of the United States, the registered voters
of this state shall elect a number of electors for President and
Vice President equal to the number of United States Senators and
United States Representatives which the state is entitled to elect.
Said electors shall be elected in the same manner as is provided for
state officers proportion to the ratio of votes they received
statewide in the general election. No electoral votes shall be
awarded to any nominee that has received less than fifteen percent
Req. No. 10737 Page 1

(15% ) of the votes cast in the general election, and such votes
shall be awarded to the candidate who received the highest number of
popular votes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10737 MJ 01/03/25


















Req. No. 10737 Page 2